Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-12,117
Notice; copy of report or finding.

Such report or finding shall not be admissible unless the party offering it shall have given notice to the adverse party a reasonable time before trial of his intention to offer it, together with a copy of the report or finding, or so much thereof as may relate to the controversy, and shall also have afforded him a reasonable opportunity to inspect and copy any records or other documents in the offering party's possession or control, on which the report or finding was based, and also the names of all persons furnishing facts upon which the report or finding was based, except that it may be admitted if the trial court finds that no substantial injustice would result from the failure to give such notice.

Laws 1951, c. 57, § 3, p. 190.

Trial court is given discretion to admit report in evidence although no copy was served. Trute v. Skeede, 162 Neb. 266, 75 N.W.2d 672 (1956).